Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.49.030

Unlawful discharge of a laser in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of unlawful discharge of a laser in the second degree if he or she knowingly and maliciously discharges a laser, under circumstances not amounting to unlawful discharge of a laser in the first degree or malicious mischief in the first or second degree:

(a) At a person, not described in RCW 9A.49.020(1) (a) through (f), who is operating a motor vehicle at the time, causing an impairment of the safety or operation of a motor vehicle by negatively affecting the driver; or

(b) At a person described in RCW 9A.49.020(1) (b) through (f), causing a substantial risk of an impairment or interruption as described in RCW 9A.49.020(1) (b) through (f); or

(c) At a person in order to intimidate or threaten that person.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 9A.49.040, unlawful discharge of a laser in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1999 c 180 s 4.]